Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 5
LICENSE FEES AND EXCISE TAXES

44-3-501. State fees - rules - one-time fee waiver - repeal.

The applicant shall pay the following license and permit fees to the department annually in advance:

For each resident and nonresident manufacturer's license, the fee shall be:

For each brewery, three hundred dollars;

For each winery, three hundred dollars;

For each distillery or rectifier:

On or after August 10, 2016, and before August 10, 2017, six hundred seventy-five dollars; and

On or after August 10, 2017, three hundred dollars;

For each limited winery, seventy dollars;

For each importer's license, three hundred dollars;

For each wholesaler's liquor license:

On or after August 10, 2016, and before August 10, 2017, eight hundred dollars; and

On or after August 10, 2017, five hundred fifty dollars;

For each wholesaler's beer license, five hundred fifty dollars;

For each retail liquor store license, one hundred dollars;

For each liquor-licensed drugstore license, one hundred dollars;

For each beer and wine license, seventy-five dollars;

For each hotel and restaurant license, seventy-five dollars;

For each resort-complex-related facility permit, seventy-five dollars per related facility, as defined in section 44-3-413 (2)(e);

For each related facility permit, seventy-five dollars per related facility, as defined in section 44-3-413 (3)(f);

For each tavern license, seventy-five dollars;

For each optional premises license, seventy-five dollars;

For each retail gaming tavern license, seventy-five dollars;

For each brew pub, distillery pub, or vintner's restaurant license, three hundred twenty-five dollars;

For each club license, seventy-five dollars;

For each arts license, seventy-five dollars;

For each racetrack license, seventy-five dollars;

For each public transportation system license, seventy-five dollars for each dining, club, or parlor car; plane; bus; or other vehicle in which such liquor is sold. No additional license fee shall be required by any municipality, city and county, or county for the sale of such liquor in dining, club, or parlor cars; planes; buses; or other conveyances.

For each bed and breakfast permit, fifty dollars;

For each art gallery permit, fifty dollars;

For each wine packaging permit, two hundred dollars;

For each lodging and entertainment license, seventy-five dollars;

For each manager's permit, one hundred dollars.

Notwithstanding the amount specified for any fee in subsection (1) of this section, the executive director by rule, or as otherwise provided by law, may reduce the amount of one or more of the fees if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3) to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of one or more of the fees is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the executive director, by rule or as otherwise provided by law, may increase the amount of one or more of the fees as provided in section 24-75-402 (4).

The state licensing authority shall establish fees for processing the following types of applications, notices, or reports required to be submitted to the state licensing authority:

Applications for new liquor licenses pursuant to section 44-3-304 and rules adopted pursuant to that section;

Applications to change location pursuant to section 44-3-301 (9) and rules adopted pursuant to that section;

Applications for transfer of ownership pursuant to section 44-3-303 (1)(c) and rules adopted pursuant to that section;

Applications for modification of licensed premises pursuant to section 44-3-301 and rules adopted pursuant to that section;

Applications for alternating use of premises pursuant to section 44-3-402 (3), 44-3-403 (2)(a), or 44-3-417 (1)(b) and rules adopted pursuant to those sections;

Applications for branch warehouse permits pursuant to section 44-3-407 and rules adopted pursuant to that section;

Applications for approval of a contract to sell alcohol beverages pursuant to section 44-3-413 (4)(c);

Applications for warehouse storage permits pursuant to section 44-3-202 and rules adopted pursuant to that section;

Applications for duplicate licenses;

Applications for wine shipment permits pursuant to section 44-3-104;

Sole source registrations or new product registrations pursuant to section 44-3-901 (4)(b);

Hotel and restaurant optional premises registrations;

Expired license renewal and reissuance applications pursuant to section 44-3-302;

Notice of change of name or trade name pursuant to section 44-3-301 and rules adopted pursuant to that section;

Applications for wine packing permits pursuant to section 44-3-425;

Applications for transfer of ownership, change of location, and license merger and conversion pursuant to section 44-3-410 (1)(b);

Applications for manager's permits pursuant to section 44-3-427;

Applications for the renewal of a license or permit issued in accordance with this article 3; and

Applications for a permit for or attachment to a communal outdoor dining area or for modification of a licensed premises to include a communal outdoor dining area.

The amounts of such fees, when added to the other fees transferred to the liquor enforcement division and state licensing authority cash fund pursuant to sections 44-4-105, 44-3-502 (1), and 44-5-104 shall reflect the direct and indirect costs of the liquor enforcement division and the state licensing authority in the administration and enforcement of this article 3 and articles 4 and 5 of this title 44.

The state licensing authority may charge corporate applicants and limited liability companies licensed under this article 3 and article 4 of this title 44 a fee for the cost of each fingerprint analysis and background investigation undertaken to qualify new officers, directors, stockholders, members, or managers pursuant to the requirements of section 44-3-307 (1); however, the state licensing authority shall not collect such a fee if the applicant has already undergone a background investigation by and paid a fee to a local licensing authority.

At least annually, the amounts of the fees shall be reviewed and, if necessary, adjusted to reflect the direct and indirect costs of the liquor enforcement division and the state licensing authority.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the state licensing authority shall establish a basic fee which shall be paid at the time of service of any subpoena upon the state licensing authority or upon any employee of the division, plus a fee for meals and a fee for mileage at the rate prescribed for state officers and employees in section 24-9-104 for each mile actually and necessarily traveled in going to and returning from the place named in the subpoena. If the person named in the subpoena is required to attend the place named in the subpoena for more than one day, there shall be paid, in advance, a sum to be established by the state licensing authority for each day of attendance to cover the expenses of the person named in the subpoena.

The subpoena fee established pursuant to subsection (4) of this section shall not be applicable to any state or local governmental agency.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the following fees imposed pursuant to this section are waived for twelve months following December 7, 2020:

License fees imposed pursuant to subsections (1)(a)(IV), (1)(g), (1)(h), (1)(i), (1)(j), (1)(k), (1)(l), (1)(m), (1)(n), (1)(o), (1)(p), (1)(q), and (1)(v) of this section and pursuant to section 44-4-105;

Application fees imposed pursuant to subsections (3)(a)(I), (3)(a)(XII), and (3)(a)(XIII) of this section and pursuant to regulation 47-302 (F), 1 CCR 203-2; and

All fees associated with the renewal of a license.

The waiver of fees specified in subsection (6)(a) of this section applies to the following license types:

A limited winery license under section 44-3-403;

A beer and wine license under section 44-3-411;

A hotel and restaurant license under section 44-3-413;

A tavern license under section 44-3-414;

An optional premises license under section 44-3-415;

A retail gaming tavern license under section 44-3-416;

A brew pub license under section 44-3-417;

A club license under section 44-3-418;

An arts license under section 44-3-419;

A racetrack license under section 44-3-420;

A vintner's restaurant license under section 44-3-422;

A distillery pub license under section 44-3-426;

A lodging and entertainment license under section 44-3-428;

A fermented malt beverage license under section 44-4-107 (1)(b); and

A fermented malt beverage license under section 44-4-107 (1)(c).

The general assembly shall appropriate an amount not to exceed one million eight hundred seventy-eight thousand dollars from the general fund to the liquor enforcement division and state licensing authority cash fund for use by the department to offset the reduction in fee revenues used by the department for the direct and indirect costs of the liquor enforcement division and the state licensing authority in the administration and enforcement of articles 3 to 5 of this title 44.

This subsection (6) is repealed, effective December 31, 2022.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1033, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(3)(a)(V) amended, (SB 19-011), ch. 1, p. 14, § 23, effective January 31; IP(1) and (2) amended, (SB 19-241), ch. 390, p. 3479, § 63, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(3)(a)(XVII) amended and (3)(a)(XVIII) added, (SB 20-086), ch. 67, p. 270, § 2, effective September 14.

L. 2020 1st Ex. Sess.:

(6) added, (SB 20B-001), ch. 2, p. 16, § 7, effective December 7.

L. 2021:

(3)(a)(XVII) and (3)(a)(XVIII) amended and (3)(a)(XIX) added, (HB 21-1027), ch. 290, p. 1716, § 4, effective June 22.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-501 as it existed prior to 2018.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 20B-001, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2020, First Extraordinary Session.

44-3-502. Fees and taxes - allocation.

All state license fees and taxes provided for by this article 3 and all fees provided for by section 44-3-501 (3) and (4) for processing applications, reports, and notices shall be paid to the department, which shall transmit the fees and taxes to the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall credit eighty-five percent of the fees and taxes to the old age pension fund and the balance to the general fund.

An amount equal to the revenues attributable to fifty dollars of each state license fee provided for by this article 3 and the processing fees provided for by section 44-3-501 (3) and (4) for processing applications, reports, and notices shall be transferred out of the general fund to the liquor enforcement division and state licensing authority cash fund. The transfer shall be made by the state treasurer as soon as possible after the twentieth day of the month following the payment of such fees.

The expenditures of the state licensing authority and the liquor enforcement division shall be paid out of appropriations from the liquor enforcement division and state licensing authority cash fund as provided in section 44-6-101.

Eighty-five percent of the local license fees shall be paid to the department, which shall transmit the fees to the state treasurer to be credited to the old age pension fund.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1037, § 2, effective October 1; (1)(c) amended, (HB 18-1026), ch. 24, p. 281, § 5, effective October 1.

44-3-503. Excise tax - records - rules - definition.

An excise tax at the rate of 8.0 cents per gallon, or the same per unit volume tax applied to metric measure, on all malt liquors and hard cider, 7.33 cents per liter on all vinous liquors except hard cider, and 60.26 cents per liter on all spirituous liquors is imposed, and the taxes shall be collected on all such respective beverages, not otherwise exempt from the tax, sold, offered for sale, or used in this state; except that, upon the same beverages, only one such tax shall be paid in this state. The manufacturer thereof, the holder of a winery direct shipper's permit, or the first licensee receiving alcohol beverages in this state if shipped from without the state, shall be primarily liable for the payment of any tax or tax surcharge imposed pursuant to this section; but, if the beverage is transported by a manufacturer or wholesaler to a point outside of the state and disposed of there, then the manufacturer or wholesaler, upon the filing with the state licensing authority of a duplicate bill of lading, invoice, or affidavit showing such transaction, shall not be subject to the tax provided in this section on such beverages, and, if such tax has already been paid, it shall be refunded to said manufacturer or wholesaler. For purposes of this section, "manufacturer" includes brew pub, distillery pub, and vintner's restaurant licensees.

The department shall promulgate rules concerning the excise tax applied to powdered alcohol at 60.26 cents per liter for the amount of liters of water suggested to be added by the manufacturer's packaging.

Effective July 1, 2000, a wine development fee at the rate of 1.0 cent per liter is imposed on all vinous liquors except hard cider sold, offered for sale, or used in this state. An amount equal to one hundred percent of the wine development fee collected pursuant to this subsection (1)(c)(I) shall be transferred from the general fund to the Colorado wine industry development fund created in section 35-29.5-105. Such transfers shall be made by the state treasurer as soon as possible after the twentieth day of the month following the collection of such wine development fee.

In addition to the excise tax imposed pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section, an additional excise tax surcharge at the rate of 5.0 cents per liter for the first nine thousand liters, 3.0 cents per liter for the next thirty-six thousand liters, and 1.0 cent per liter for all additional amounts, is imposed on all vinous liquors except hard cider produced by Colorado licensed wineries and sold, offered for sale, or used in this state. An amount equal to one hundred percent of the excise tax surcharge collected pursuant to this subsection (1)(c)(II) shall be transferred from the general fund to the Colorado wine industry development fund created in section 35-29.5-105. Such transfers shall be made by the state treasurer as soon as possible after the twentieth day of the month following the collection of such excise tax surcharge.

An excise tax of ten dollars per ton of grapes is imposed upon all grapes of the vinifera varieties or other produce used in the production of wine in this state by a licensed Colorado winery or vintner's restaurant, whether true or hybrid. The excise tax imposed pursuant to this subsection (1)(d) shall be paid to the department by the licensed winery or vintner's restaurant at the time of purchase of the product by the winery or vintner's restaurant or of importation of the product, whichever is later. An amount equal to one hundred percent of such excise tax shall be transferred from the general fund to the Colorado wine industry development fund created in section 35-29.5-105. Such transfers shall be made by the state treasurer as soon as possible after the twentieth day of the month following the collection of such excise tax.

The excise tax imposed in accordance with this subsection (1)(d) does not apply to produce used in the production of hard cider.

The policy of this state is that alcoholics and intoxicated persons may not be subjected to criminal prosecution because of their consumption of alcohol beverages, but rather should be afforded a continuum of treatment in order that they may lead normal lives as productive members of society. The general assembly finds that the cost of implementing a statewide treatment plan is greater than originally estimated. By increasing the excise tax on alcohol beverages in Colorado, it is the intent of this general assembly that the increased revenues derived from this subsection (1) be viewed as one of the sources of funding for the future development of alcoholism treatment programs under the statute enacted in 1973 and for the payment of other related direct and indirect costs caused by the consumption of alcohol beverages.

The state licensing authority shall make and publish such rules to secure and enforce the collection and payment of the tax as it may deem proper if the rules are not inconsistent with the provisions of this article 3.

Except as provided in subsection (1)(d) of this section, the excise taxes and excise tax surcharges provided for in this section shall be paid to the department upon the filing of the return provided for in subsection (4) of this section and shall be delivered to the department on or before the twentieth day of the month following the month in which such alcohol beverages are first sold in this state. As used in this subsection (3), "first sold" means the sale or disposal that occurs when a licensed wholesaler sells, transfers, or otherwise disposes of a product, when a manufacturer sells to a licensed wholesaler or a consumer, or when a holder of a winery direct shipper's permit ships to a personal consumer in this state.

Each licensed manufacturer and wholesaler of alcohol beverages within this state shall file, on or before the twentieth day of each month, an exact, verified return with the state licensing authority showing for the preceding calendar month the quantities of alcohol beverages:

Constituting the licensee's beginning and ending inventory for the month;

Manufactured by the licensee in this state;

Shipped to the licensee from within this state and received by the licensee in this state;

Shipped to the licensee from outside this state and received by the licensee in this state;

Sold or disposed of by the licensee to persons or purchasers in this state;

Sold or disposed of by the licensee to persons or purchasers outside this state, separately indicating those sales or transactions of alcohol beverages to which the excise tax is not applicable; and

For persons licensed pursuant to section 44-3-402 (3), 44-3-403 (2)(a), or 44-3-417 (1)(b), a separate report of vinous or malt liquors, as applicable, that were manufactured or inventoried in, or transferred from, an alternating proprietor licensed premises.

Each holder of a winery direct shipper's permit under section 44-3-104 shall file, on or before the twentieth day of each calendar month, an exact, verified return with the state licensing authority showing for the preceding calendar month the quantities of vinous liquor shipped to personal consumers in this state.

The return, on forms prescribed by the state licensing authority, shall also show the amount of excise tax payable, after allowances for all proper deductions, for alcohol beverages sold by the manufacturer, wholesaler, or holder of a winery direct shipper's permit in this state and shall include any additional information as the state licensing authority may require for the proper administration of this article 3. The payment of the excise tax provided for in this section, in the amount disclosed by the return, shall accompany the return and shall be paid to the department. Each manufacturer, wholesaler, or holder of a winery direct shipper's permit required to file a return shall keep complete and accurate books and records, accounts, and other documents as may be necessary to substantiate the accuracy of his or her return and the amount of excise tax due and shall retain such records for a period of three years.

The state licensing authority, after public hearing of which the licensee shall have due notice as provided in this article 3, shall suspend or revoke any license or winery direct shipper's permit issued pursuant to this article 3 for a failure to pay any excise tax required by this article 3 and may suspend or revoke the license or permit for a violation of or failure to comply with the rules promulgated by the authority.

If the excise tax is not paid when due, there shall be added to the amount of the tax as a penalty a sum equivalent to ten percent thereof and, in addition thereto, interest on the tax and a penalty at the rate of one percent a month or fraction of a month from the date the tax became due until paid. Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve any person otherwise liable from liability for payment of the excise tax.

The department shall make a refund or allow a credit to the manufacturer, the wholesaler, or the holder of a winery direct shipper's permit, as the case may be, of the amount of the excise tax paid on alcohol beverages sold in this state when, after payment of the excise tax, the alcohol beverages are rendered unsalable by reason of destruction or damage upon submission of evidence satisfactory to the state licensing authority that the excise tax has actually been paid. Such refund or credit shall be made by the department within sixty days after the submission of evidence satisfactory to the department.

In order to economize and to simplify administrative procedures, the state licensing authority may authorize a procedure whereby a manufacturer or wholesaler of alcohol beverages or holder of a winery direct shipper's permit entitled by law to a refund of the tax provided in this section may instead receive a credit against the tax due on other sales by claiming said credit on the next month's return and attaching a duplicate bill of lading, invoice, or affidavit showing such transaction.

To the extent and so long as federal law precludes this state from collecting its excise tax on vinous and spirituous liquors sold and delivered on ceded federal property, any manufacturer or wholesaler of such liquors making any such sales and deliveries on such federal property within the boundaries of this state may receive a refund of or a credit for the excise tax paid to this state on such liquors.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1037, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(1)(a) and (4)(g) amended, (SB 19-011), ch. 1, p. 14, § 24, effective January 31; (1)(d) amended, (SB 19-142), ch. 421, p. 3686, § 2, effective September 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-503 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-504. Lien to secure payment of taxes - exemptions - recovery.

The state of Colorado and the department shall have a lien, to secure the payment of the taxes, penalties, and interest imposed pursuant to section 44-3-503 upon all the assets and property of the wholesaler or manufacturer owing the tax, including the stock in trade, business fixtures, and equipment owned or used by the wholesaler or manufacturer in the conduct of business, as long as a delinquency in the payment of the tax continues. The lien shall be prior to any lien of any kind whatsoever, including existing liens for taxes.

Any wholesaler and manufacturer or person in possession shall provide a copy of any lease pertaining to the assets and property described in subsection (1)(a) of this section to the department within ten days after seizure by the department of the assets and property. The department shall verify that the lease is bona fide and notify the owner that the lease has been received by the department. The department shall use its best efforts to notify the owner of the real or personal property that might be subject to the lien created in subsection (1)(a) of this section. The real or personal property of an owner who has made a bona fide lease to a wholesaler or manufacturer shall be exempt from the lien created in subsection (1)(a) of this section if the property can reasonably be identified from the lease description or if the lessee is given an option to purchase in the lease and has not exercised the option to become the owner of the property leased. This exemption shall be effective from the date of the execution of the lease. The exemption shall also apply if the lease is recorded with the county clerk and recorder of the county where the property is located or based or a memorandum of the lease is filed with the department on such forms as may be prescribed by the department after the execution of the lease at a cost for the filing of two dollars and fifty cents per document. Motor vehicles that are properly registered in this state, showing the lessor as owner thereof, shall be exempt from the lien created in subsection (1)(a) of this section; except that said lien shall apply to the extent that the lessee has an earned reserve, allowance for depreciation not to exceed fair market value, or similar interest that is or may be credited to the lessee. Where the lessor and lessee are blood relatives or relatives by law or have twenty-five percent or more common ownership, a lease between the lessee and the lessor shall not be considered as bona fide for the purposes of this section.

Any wholesaler or manufacturer who files a return pursuant to section 44-3-503 but who fails to accompany it with payment of the excise tax disclosed on the return shall be sent a notice by the executive director. The notice shall state that the excise tax is due and unpaid and shall state the amount of the tax, penalty, and interest owed pursuant to section 44-3-503. The notice shall be sent by first-class mail and shall be directed to the last address of the wholesaler or manufacturer on file with the department.

If a wholesaler or manufacturer fails to file both the return and the payment required by section 44-3-503, the executive director shall make an estimate, based upon such information as may be available, of the amount of taxes due for the period for which the wholesaler or manufacturer is delinquent and shall add any penalty and interest authorized in section 44-3-503. The executive director shall give the delinquent taxpayer written notice of the estimated tax, penalty, and interest, which notice shall be sent by first-class mail and shall be directed to the last address of the person on file with the department.

The remedies available to a taxpayer pursuant to article 21 of title 39 shall be available to any wholesaler or manufacturer who seeks to contest the estimated tax, penalty, or interest specified in the notice mailed pursuant to subsection (2)(b)(I) of this section.

If any taxes, penalties, or interest imposed pursuant to section 44-3-503 are not paid within ten days after the notice is mailed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the executive director may seek to enforce collection of the unpaid amounts in accordance with the provisions of article 21 of title 39, to the extent that those provisions are not in conflict with or inconsistent with the provisions of this article 3.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1040, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-504 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-505. Local license fees.

The applicant shall pay the following license fees to the treasurer of the municipality, city and county, or county where the licensed premises is located annually in advance:

For each retail liquor store license for premises located within any municipality or city and county, one hundred fifty dollars;

For each retail liquor store license for premises located outside the municipal limits of any municipality or city and county, two hundred fifty dollars;

For each liquor-licensed drugstore license for premises located within any municipality or city and county, one hundred fifty dollars;

For each liquor-licensed drugstore license for premises located outside the municipal limits of any municipality or city and county, two hundred fifty dollars;

For each beer and wine license for premises located within any municipality or city and county, except as provided in subsection (1)(c)(III) of this section, three hundred twenty-five dollars;

For each beer and wine license for premises located outside the municipal limits of any municipality or city and county, except as provided in subsection (1)(c)(III) of this section, four hundred twenty-five dollars;

For each beer and wine license issued to a resort hotel, three hundred seventy-five dollars;

For each hotel and restaurant license, five hundred dollars;

For each tavern license, five hundred dollars;

For each optional premises license, five hundred dollars;

For each retail gaming tavern license, five hundred dollars;

For each application for approval of a contract to sell alcohol beverages pursuant to section 44-3-413 (4)(c), three hundred twenty-five dollars;

For each brew pub, distillery pub, or vintner's restaurant license, five hundred dollars;

For each club license, two hundred seventy-five dollars;

For each arts license, two hundred seventy-five dollars;

For each racetrack license, five hundred dollars;

For each bed and breakfast permit, twenty-five dollars;

For each resort-complex-related facility permit, one hundred dollars per related facility, as defined in section 44-3-413 (2)(e);

For each art gallery permit, twenty-five dollars;

For each lodging and entertainment license, five hundred dollars;

For each related facility permit, one hundred dollars per related facility, as defined in section 44-3-413 (3)(f).

No rebate shall be paid by any municipality, city and county, or county of any alcohol beverage license fee paid for any such license issued by it except upon affirmative action by the respective local licensing authority rebating a proportionate amount of such license fee.

Eighty-five percent of the local license fees provided for in this article 3 and article 4 of this title 44 must be paid to the department, which shall transmit said fees to the state treasurer to be credited to the old age pension fund.

Each application for a license provided for in this article 3 and article 4 of this title 44 filed with a local licensing authority must be accompanied by an application fee in an amount determined by the local licensing authority to cover actual and necessary expenses, subject to the following limitations:

For a new license, not to exceed the following:

On or before July 1, 2008, six hundred twenty-five dollars;

After July 1, 2008, and before July 2, 2009, seven hundred fifty dollars;

After July 1, 2009, and before July 2, 2010, eight hundred seventy-five dollars;

After July 2, 2010, one thousand dollars;

For a transfer of location or ownership, not to exceed the following for each:

On or before July 1, 2008, six hundred twenty-five dollars;

After July 1, 2008, seven hundred fifty dollars;

For a renewal of license, not to exceed the following; except that an expired license renewal fee shall not exceed five hundred dollars:

On or before July 1, 2008, seventy-five dollars;

After July 1, 2008, one hundred dollars;

For a new license or renewal application for an art gallery permit, not to exceed one hundred dollars;

For a transfer of ownership, change of location, and license merger and conversion pursuant to section 44-3-410 (1)(b), not to exceed one thousand dollars.

No fees or charges of any kind, except as provided in this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44, may be charged by the local licensing authority to the license holder or applicant for the purposes of granting or renewing a license or transferring ownership or location of a license.

The local licensing authority may charge corporate applicants and limited liability companies up to one hundred dollars for the cost of each fingerprint analysis and background investigation undertaken to qualify new officers, directors, stockholders, members, or managers pursuant to the requirements of section 44-3-307 (1); however, no local licensing authority shall collect such a fee if the applicant has already undergone a background investigation by and paid a fee to the state licensing authority.

The local licensing authority may charge a fee to approve the attachment to a communal outdoor dining area or for modification of a licensed premises to include a communal outdoor dining area. The local licensing authority shall set the fee in an amount to cover the direct and indirect costs of administering the approval.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1042, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(6) added, (HB 21-1027), ch. 290, p. 1716, § 5, effective June 22.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-505 as it existed prior to 2018.